Massachusetts, session 194th, H2679.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 4 of Chapter 22D, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting, 
in line 80, after the word “code”, the following paragraph:- 
“The provisions of the fire safety code shall apply to all buildings and structures, other 
than the State House, including buildings and structures owned, operated, or controlled by the 
Commonwealth, its agencies, departments, boards, commissions, or political subdivisions. The 
State Fire Marshal or his/her designee shall enforce the State Fire Code in all state owned or 
controlled buildings.” 

of 5 8  SECTION 2. Subsection (a) of Section 94 of Chapter 143 of the Massachusetts General 
Laws, as so appearing in the 2012 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following 
sentence to the second paragraph:- 
This shall not include standards for fire protection or life safety systems, as defined in 
Section 1 of Chapter 148, installed in new or substantially modified buildings in accordance with 
regulations prescribed by the Board of Fire Prevention Regulations. 
SECTION 3. Section 95 of Chapter 143 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as so 
appearing, is hereby amended by striking out, in subsection (a), in line 5, the words:- and fire 
prevention. 
SECTION 4. Section 96 of Chapter 143 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as so 
appearing, is hereby amended by inserting in line 3, between the words “demolition” and 
“promulgated”, the following words:- or fire prevention. 
SECTION 5. Section 1 of Chapter 148 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as so 
appearing in the 2012 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, between the definitions 
of “Division” and “Head of the Fire Department”, the new definition:- 
Fire Protection and Life Safety Systems, any equipment or system relating to fire 
protection, fire detection, fire warning, fire suppression or carbon monoxide alarms installed in 
any occupancy  defined in 780 CMR or as otherwise defined by the Board of Fire Prevention 
Regulations through regulation. 

of 5 27  SECTION 6. Section 1 of Chapter 148 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as so 
appearing in the 2012 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the definition of 
Fire Protection and Life Safety Systems, the following definition:- 
Fire Safety Code, the comprehensive regulations promulgated by the Board of Fire 
Prevention Regulations pursuant to the provisions of Section 4 of Chapter 22D of the General 
Laws and pursuant to this chapter. 
SECTION 7. Section 26A of Chapter 148 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as so 
appearing in the 2012 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in lines 3 and 4, the 
words “state building code”, and substituting in place thereof the following words:- state fire 
code. 
SECTION 8. Section 26A of Chapter 148, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking 
out, in lines 12 and 13, the words “board of appeals as provided in the state building code and 
section twenty-three of chapter twenty-three B”, and substituting in place thereof the following 
words:- Fire Prevention Regulations Appeals Board as provided in Chapter 22D, section 5. 
SECTION 9. Section 26A of Chapter 148 , as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out, in lines 3 and 4, the words “state building code” and substituting in place thereof the 
following words:- state fire code 
SECTION 10. Section 26B of Chapter 148, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out, in lines 4 and 5, the words “state building code” and substituting in place thereof the 
following words:- state fire code. 

of 5 47  SECTION 11. Section 26B of Chapter 148, as so appearing, is hereby further amended 
by striking out, in lines 13 and 14, the words the “board of appeals as provided in the state 
building code and section twenty-three of chapter twenty-three B”, and substituting in place 
thereof the following words:- Fire Prevention Regulations Appeals Board as provided in Chapter 
22D, section 5 
SECTION 12. Subsection (d) of Section 26F½ of Chapter 148 , as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by striking out, in lines 25-28, the first sentence of the subsection. 
SECTION 13. Section 26G of Chapter 148, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out, in line 5, the words “state building code” and substituting in place thereof the 
following words:- state fire code. 
SECTION 14. Section 26G½ of Chapter 148, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out in lines 6, 7, 19 and 24 the words “state building code” and substituting in place 
thereof the following words:- state fire code 
SECTION 15. Section 26H of Chapter 148, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out, in line 4, the words “state building code” and substituting in place thereof the 
following words:- state fire code. 
SECTION 16. Section 26I of Chapter 148, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out, in line 9, the words “state building code” and substituting in place thereof the 
following words:- state fire code. 
SECTION 17. Section 26I of Chapter 148, as so appearing, is further amended by adding 
the following sentence at the end of the section: 

of 5 68  Whomever is aggrieved by the head of the fire departments interpretation, order, 
requirement, direction, or failure to act under the provisions of this section, may, within forty-
five days after the service of notice thereof, appeal from such interpretation, order, requirement, 
direction, or failure to act to the automatic sprinkler appeals board as provided in Section 201 of 
Chapter 6. 
SECTION 18. Section 28 of Chapter 148, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding, 
after subsection (3), the following new subsection: 
(4) to provide adequate standards for the design, installation, or maintenance of fire 
protection and life safety systems in buildings or structures. 
SECTION 19. The provisions of this act shall take effect on January 1, 2017. The 
provisions of this act shall not apply to any building or structure which was issued a building 
permit prior to January 1, 2017.